North Carolina, session 2025, HB1184.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ACCOUNTABILITY AND REPORTING FOR OPPORTUNITY
SCHOLARSHIP SCHOOLS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-562.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.5. Obligations of nonpublic schools accepting eligible students receiving
scholarship grants.
(a) A nonpublic school that accepts eligible students receiving scholarship grants shall
comply with the following:
(1) Provide Annually provide to the Authority documentation for required tuition
and fees charged to the student by the nonpublic school.
(2) Provide to the Authority a criminal background check conducted for the staff
member with the highest decision-making authority, as defined by the bylaws,
articles of incorporation, or other governing document. For all teachers, the
nonpublic school shall adopt a policy requiring criminal history checks under
G.S. 115C-332. Each nonpublic school shall apply its policy uniformly in
requiring applicants for employment to be checked for a criminal history
before the applicant is given an unconditional job offer. A nonpublic school
may employ an applicant conditionally while the board is checking the
person's criminal history and making a decision based on the results of the
check. The nonpublic school may adopt a policy providing for periodic checks
of criminal history of teachers. A nonpublic school shall indicate, upon the
inquiry by any other public school unit or nonpublic school in the State, as to
the reason for an employee's resignation or dismissal, if an employee's
criminal history was relevant to the employee's resignation or dismissal.
Information provided to the Authority in accordance with this subdivision is
otherwise privileged information and is not a public record but is for the
exclusive use of the Authority.
*H1184-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Provide to the parent or guardian of an eligible student, whose tuition and fees
are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant, an annual written
explanation of the student's progress, including the student's scores on
standardized achievement tests.
(4) Administer, at least once in each school year, tests as provided in this
subdivision. Test performance data shall be submitted to the Authority by July
15 of each year. Test performance data reported to the Authority under this
subdivision is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.
Tests shall be administered to all eligible students enrolled in grades three and
higher whose tuition and fees are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship
grant as follows:
a. The nationally standardized test designated by the Authority in grades
three and through eight.
b. The ACT in grade 11.
c. A nationally standardized test or other nationally standardized
equivalent measurement selected by the chief administrative officer of
the nonpublic school in all other grades four and higher. For grades
four through seven, the nationally standardized test or other equivalent
measurement selected must measure achievement in the areas of
English grammar, reading, spelling, and mathematics. For grades nine,
10, and 12, the nationally standardized test or other equivalent
measurement selected must measure either (i) achievement in the areas
of English grammar, reading, spelling, and mathematics or (ii)
competencies in the verbal and quantitative areas.
(5) Provide to the Authority graduation rates of the students receiving scholarship
grants grants, including four-year cohort graduation rates, in a manner
consistent with nationally recognized standards.Title I of the Elementary and
Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended, and any associated federal
regulations.
(6) Contract with a certified public accountant to perform a financial review, an
audit, consistent with generally accepted methods of accounting or any other
comprehensive basis of accounting recognized by the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants (AICPA) for each school year in which the
school enrolls 70 or more students receiving scholarship grants or scholarship
funds awarded by the Authority.accepts students receiving one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) or more in scholarship grants awarded under this
Part. If a school accepts students receiving less than one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000), it shall contract pursuant to this subdivision for an audit
every three years. A nonpublic school shall report the results of an audit
conducted under this subdivision to the Authority and the State Auditor by
December 31 of the year in which the audit is conducted.
(7) Maintain a school facility within the State where in-person instruction is
provided. This subdivision does not prohibit a school from offering
remote-only courses of instruction in addition to in-person instruction.
(8) Provide the following information annually to the Division:
a. Name and address of the school, including physical location address.
A school with more than one physical location shall establish a
separate notice of intent for each physical location and shall provide
all information required by this subdivision for each physical location.
b. The name of the owners and chief administrator.
c. Number of students in attendance at the school as of October 1.
Page 2 House Bill 1184-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. All attendance records of students receiving scholarship grants from
the previous school year.
e. The percentage of teachers with a teacher license.
f. Whether the nonpublic school is accredited and, if so, the identity of
that accreditor.
g. Documentation of a competed fire inspection in the previous 365 days.
h. Curriculum used by the nonpublic school for each grade level.
i. The number of students receiving scholarship grants for the first time
who attended a public school unit in the previous school year.
j. The number of students receiving scholarship grants who attended a
public school unit in the previous school year.
(9) To the extent permitted by federal law and to the extent this information can
be provided without permitting the personally identifiable information of a
student to be revealed, report to the Authority on the following information:
a. The number of children enrolled at the school who are recipients of
scholarship funds and who have a disability and an Individualized
Education Plan (IEP).
b. If there are any children enrolled at the school who are recipients of
scholarship funds and who have a disability and an IEP, whether the
nonpublic school is educating each child in compliance with his or her
IDEA, as defined in G.S. 115C-106.3(6), and applicable policies
adopted by the State Board of Education for local school
administrative units under Article 9 of Chapter 115C of the General
Statutes.
(10) Comply with the requirements of Article 8C of this Chapter, including the
following:
a. School Risk Management Plan. – The nonpublic school, in
coordination with local law enforcement agencies, shall adopt a
School Risk Management Plan (SRMP) relating to incidents of school
violence. In constructing and maintaining these plans, the nonpublic
school shall utilize the School Risk and Response Management
System established pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.49A. These plans are
not considered a public record as the term "public record" is defined
under G.S. 132-1 and shall not be subject to inspection and
examination under G.S. 132-6.
b. Schematic diagrams and school crisis kits. – The nonpublic school
shall provide schematic diagrams and keys to the main entrance of
school facilities to local law enforcement agencies, in addition to
implementing the provisions in G.S. 115C-105.52.
c. School safety exercises. – At least once a year, the nonpublic school
shall hold a full school-wide lockdown exercise with local law
enforcement and emergency management agencies that are part of the
school's SRMP.
d. Safety information provided to the Department of Public Safety,
Division of Emergency Management. – The nonpublic school shall
provide the following: (i) schematic diagrams, including digital
schematic diagrams, and (ii) emergency response information
requested by the Division for the SRMP. The schematic diagrams and
emergency response information are not considered public records as
the term "public record" is defined under G.S. 132-1 and shall not be
subject to inspection and examination under G.S. 132-6.
House Bill 1184-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) A nonpublic school that accepts students receiving scholarship grants shall not require
any additional fees based on the status of the student as a scholarship grant recipient.
(c) A nonpublic school enrolling more than 25 students in any grade whose tuition and
fees are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant shall provide and retain information on
student test performance in each grade with more than 25 students, as follows:
(1) Report to the Authority on the aggregate standardized test performance of
eligible students in grades three, eight, three through eight and 11. Aggregate
test performance data reported to the Authority which does not contain
personally identifiable student data shall be a public record under Chapter 132
of the General Statutes. Test performance data may be shared with public or
private institutions of higher education located in North Carolina and shall be
provided to an independent research organization selected by the Authority
for research purposes as permitted by the Federal Education Rights and
Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.
(2) Retain standardized test performance data for eligible students in all other
grades and annually certify to the Authority compliance with the requirements
of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) The Office of Learning Research at The University of North
Carolina shall study and report the following to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee by December 31, 2026:
(1) For the purpose of comparing student performance, recommendations for
nationally standardized tests for use in third grade through eighth grade that
would be appropriate for administering to (i) students in nonpublic schools
who are receiving Opportunity Scholarships beginning with the 2027-2028
school year and (ii) students attending schools in public school units. The
Office of Learning Research shall recommend only one test for use in each
grade.
(2) Alignment between the nationally standardized tests selected pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection and the standard course of study for third
grade through eighth grade, respectively, including a crosswalk between the
standards assessed by the nationally standardized tests and the standard course
of study.
(3) Feasibility of developing a through-grade assessment for third through eighth
grade that would meet the following criteria:
a. Assess mastery of the standard course of study.
b. Consist of multiple testing events throughout the year that are
aggregated into a summative score.
c. Replace the current end-of-grade assessments for third and eighth
grade.
d. Yield data that can be used with the Education Value-Added
Assessment System (EVAAS).
e. Comply with federal law.
SECTION 1.(c) The State Education Assistance Authority shall designate as the
nationally standardized assessments to be administered by nonpublic schools, in accordance with
G.S. 115C-562.5(a)(4), the tests recommended by the Office of Learning Research at The
University of North Carolina for use in third grade through eighth grade in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 1.(d) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-562.5(a)(1), for the report required
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.5(a)(1) for the 2026-2027 school year, the nonpublic school shall also
provide documentation for required tuition and fees charged to students receiving scholarship
Page 4 House Bill 1184-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
grant funds under Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes by the nonpublic
school for the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school years.
SECTION 1.(e) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds to be allocated to the North Carolina
Collaboratory for the Office of Learning Research to conduct the study required by subsection
(b) of this section.
SECTION 1.(f) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies beginning
with the 2026-2027 school year.

PART II. REQUIRE THE STATE AUDITOR TO ANNUALLY REVIEW AUDITS OF
AT LEAST THREE OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP SCHOOLS
SECTION 2. G.S. 147-64.6(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Responsibilities. – The Auditor is responsible for the following acts and activities:
…
(25) The Auditor shall review every year at least three completed audits of
nonpublic schools that are reported to the Auditor pursuant to
G.S. 115C-562.5(a)(6). The Auditor shall report to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee no later than March 15 of each year on the
results of this review, including the uses of taxpayer funds by the nonpublic
schools and academic outcomes of students receiving scholarship grants under
Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1184-First Edition Page 5